Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 2. Contracts with Native Corporations.

Sec. 38.95.050.
Land management contracts with Native corporations.

A corporation organized under state law pursuant to 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) may contract with the Department of Natural Resources for the management of land; however, a sale, lease, exchange or other disposal of this land may not be made without the approval of the corporation owning it. The contract is terminable upon reasonable notice by either party to it; it may cover all or a portion of the land of the corporation, and shall provide for the terms of management by reference to law or regulation or otherwise. The Department of Natural Resources is authorized to receive and expend, subject to appropriation, funds necessary to carry out its functions under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 70 SLA 1972; am § 46 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 38.15.050. Renumbered in 1973.

Sec. 38.95.060.
Exchange of land. [Repealed, § 4 ch 240 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 38.50.]